Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2326.09
Clerk of the county or district court; deputies; employees; liability.

The clerk of the county court, the clerk of the district court, their deputies or other employees, and their sureties shall not be liable for any loss resulting from the failure of any bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution as to any such deposits made and maintained as provided in sections 77-2326.01 to 77-2326.09.

Laws 1947, c. 269, § 9, p. 870;

Laws 1988, LB 370, § 17;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 50;

Laws 1990, LB 1146, § 9;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 50.